Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.1945

Golf cart.

"Golf cart" means a gas-powered or electric-powered four-wheeled vehicle originally designed and manufactured for operation on a golf course for sporting purposes and has a speed attainable in one mile of not more than twenty miles per hour. A golf cart is not a nonhighway vehicle or off-road vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.365.

[ 2011 c 171 s 12; 2010 c 217 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.